Maryland, session 2026, HB0712.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
SUBTITLE 27. ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS PRODUCT LIABILITY.
3–2701.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM” MEANS AN ENGINEERED OR
MACHINE–BASED SYSTEM WITH VARYING LEVELS OF AUTONOMY THAT CAN, FOR
EXPLICIT OR IMPLICIT OBJECTIVES, INFER FROM THE INPUTS IT RECEIVES HOW TO
GENERATE OUTPUTS THAT CAN INFLUENCE PHYSICAL OR VIRTUAL ENVIRONMENTS.
(C) “CONSEQUENTIAL DECISION” MEANS A DECISION THAT HAS A LEGAL OR
SIMILARLY SIGNIFICANT EFFECT ON AN INDIVIDUAL’S ACCESS TO THE CRIMINAL
JUSTICE SYSTEM, HOUSING, EMPLOYMENT, CREDIT, EDUCATION, HEALTH CARE, OR
INSURANCE.
(D) (1) “DEPLOYER” MEANS A PERSON, INCLUDING A DEVELOPER, THAT
USES OR OPERATES AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM FOR USE BY THE
DEPLOYER OR THIRD PARTIES.
(2) “DEPLOYER” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL OR SMALL
BUSINESS THAT HAS FEWER THAN:

HOUSE BILL 712 3
(I) 20 EMPLOYEES; OR
(II) 10,000 USERS OF ITS PRODUCT.
(E) (1) “DEVELOPER” MEANS A PERSON THAT DESIGNS, CODES,
PRODUCES, OWNS, OR SUBSTANTIALLY MODIFIES AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM FOR USE BY A DEVELOPER OR FOR USE BY THIRD PARTIES.
(2) “DEVELOPER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PERSON THAT USES AN OPEN
SOURCE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM AND DOES NOT SUBSTANTIALLY
MODIFY THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM.
(F) “DESIGN” MEANS THE INTENDED OR KNOWN PHYSICAL AND MATERIAL
CHARACTERISTICS OF A PRODUCT, INCLUDING:
(1) ANY INTENDED OR KNOWN FORMULATION OR CONTENT OF THE
PRODUCT; AND
(2) THE USUAL RESULT OF THE INTENDED METHOD OF
DEVELOPMENT OR OTHER PROCESS USED TO PRODUCE THE PRODUCT, INCLUDING
UNEXPECTED SKILLS OR BEHAVIORS THAT APPEAR IN A PRODUCT.
(G) “EXPRESS WARRANTY” MEANS ANY MATERIAL, POSITIVE STATEMENT,
AFFIRMATION OF FACT, PROMISE, OR DESCRIPTION RELATING TO A PRODUCT,
INCLUDING A SAMPLE OR MODEL OF A PRODUCT.
(H) “GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM” MEANS AN
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT CAN GENERATE DERIVED SYNTHETIC
CONTENT, SUCH AS TEXT, IMAGES, VIDEO, AND AUDIO, THAT EMULATES THE
STRUCTURE AND CHARACTERISTICS OF THE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM’S
TRAINING DATA.
(I) “HARM” MEANS:
(1) DAMAGE TO PROPERTY OTHER THAN THE ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM ITSELF;
(2) PERSONAL PHYSICAL, FINANCIAL, OR REPUTATIONAL INJURY,
ILLNESS, OR DEATH;
(3) MENTAL OR PHYSIOLOGICAL ANGUISH, EMOTIONAL HARM, OR
DISTORTION OF A PERSON’S BEHAVIOR THAT WOULD BE HIGHLY OFFENSIVE TO A
REASONABLE PERSON; OR

HOUSE BILL 712
(4) ANY LOSS OF CONSORTIUM OR SERVICES, OR OTHER LOSS
DERIVING FROM ANY TYPE OF HARM DESCRIBED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(J) “HIGH–IMPACT ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM” MEANS ANY
ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM, REGARDLESS OF THE NUMBER OF
PARAMETERS AND SUPERVISION STRUCTURE, THAT:
(1) IS USED, OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLY MAY BE USED, AS A
CONTROLLING FACTOR IN MAKING CONSEQUENTIAL DECISIONS;
(2) IS USED, OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLY MAY BE USED, TO
CATEGORIZE GROUPS OF PERSONS BY PROTECTED CHARACTERISTICS, SUCH AS
RACE, ETHNIC ORIGIN, OR RELIGIOUS BELIEF;
(3) IS USED, OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLY MAY BE USED, IN THE
DIRECT MANAGEMENT OR OPERATION OF CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE;
(4) IS USED, OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLY MAY BE USED, IN A
VEHICLE, IN A MEDICAL DEVICE, OR IN THE SAFETY SYSTEM OF A VEHICLE OR
MEDICAL DEVICE;
(5) IS USED, OR REASONABLY FORESEEABLY MAY BE USED, TO
ENGAGE IN A SYNTHETIC RELATIONSHIP; OR
(6) EXHIBITS, OR COULD BE EASILY MODIFIED TO EXHIBIT, HIGH
LEVELS OF PERFORMANCE AT TASKS THAT POSE A SERIOUS RISK TO ECONOMIC
SECURITY OR PUBLIC HEALTH OR SAFETY.
(K) (1) “MATERIAL FACT” MEANS ANY SPECIFIC CHARACTERISTIC OR
QUALITY OF THE PRODUCT.
(2) “MATERIAL FACT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A GENERAL OPINION
ABOUT THE PRODUCT OR ITS QUALITY.
(L) “METHOD OF DEVELOPMENT” MEANS THE SELECTION OF TRAINING
DATA FOR THE PRODUCT, INCLUDING THE TRAINING, TESTING, AUDITING, AND
FINE–TUNING OF THE PRODUCT.
(M) “PERSON” MEANS ANY INDIVIDUAL, CORPORATION, COMPANY,
ASSOCIATION, FIRM, PARTNERSHIP, SOCIETY, JOINT STOCK COMPANY, OR ANY
OTHER ENTITY, INCLUDING ANY GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY OR UNINCORPORATED
ASSOCIATION OF PERSONS.

HOUSE BILL 712 5
(N) “PRODUCT” MEANS A HIGH–IMPACT ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE
SYSTEM OR A GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM.
(O) “SYNTHETIC RELATIONSHIP” MEANS A SERIES OF INTERACTIONS
BETWEEN AN INDIVIDUAL AND AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT MIMICS
HUMAN INTERACTION AND EMOTIONAL RESPONSES.
3–2702.
THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT APPLY TO ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEMS
USED ONLY FOR PEER–REVIEWED SCIENTIFIC RESEARCH.
3–2703.
(A) A PERSON MAY BRING AN ACTION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION
AGAINST A DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER FOR HARM CAUSED BY A PRODUCT THAT IS
DANGEROUS OR DEFECTIVE.
(B) IN AN ACTION AGAINST A DEVELOPER ALLEGING HARM CAUSED BY A
DANGEROUS OR DEFECTIVE PRODUCT DUE TO THE DEFECTIVE DESIGN OF THE
PRODUCT, THE PLAINTIFF SHALL PROVE BY A PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE
THAT THE HARM WAS PROXIMATELY CAUSED BY THE FAILURE OF THE DEVELOPER
TO EXERCISE REASONABLE CARE AND THAT, AT THE TIME THE PRODUCT LEFT THE
DEVELOPER’S CONTROL:
(1) THE DEVELOPER KNEW OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN
OF THE DESIGN DEFECT THAT CAUSED THE HARM;
(2) THE DEVELOPER ACCOUNTED FOR INTENDED USES AND
REASONABLY FORESEEABLE UNINTENDED USES OF THE PRODUCT; AND
(3) A TECHNOLOGICALLY FEASIBLE AND PRACTICAL ALTERNATIVE
DESIGN EXISTED THAT WOULD HAVE MITIGATED OR AVOIDED THE FORESEEABLE
RISK OF HARM WITHOUT SIGNIFICANTLY IMPAIRING THE INTENDED USE OF THE
PRODUCT.
(C) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “ADEQUATE INSTRUCTION OR WARNING”
MEANS AN INSTRUCTION OR A WARNING REGARDING A DANGER THAT WOULD
SUFFICIENTLY INFORM A REASONABLY PRUDENT PERSON ON THE SAFE USE AND
DANGERS OF A PRODUCT.
(2) IN AN ACTION AGAINST A DEVELOPER ALLEGING HARM CAUSED

HOUSE BILL 712
BY A DANGEROUS OR DEFECTIVE PRODUCT DUE TO A FAILURE TO PROVIDE
ADEQUATE INSTRUCTION OR WARNING, A PLAINTIFF SHALL PROVE BY A
PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE THAT THE HARM WAS PROXIMATELY CAUSED
BY THE FAILURE TO PROVIDE ADEQUATE INSTRUCTION OR WARNING AND THAT, AT
THE TIME THE PRODUCT LEFT THE DEVELOPER’S CONTROL, THE DEVELOPER KNEW
OR REASONABLY SHOULD HAVE KNOWN OF THE DANGER POSED BY THE PRODUCT.
(3) IT IS A DEFENSE TO AN ACTION AGAINST A DEVELOPER FOR HARM
CAUSED BY A FAILURE TO INSTRUCT OR WARN THAT:
(I) THE USER OR CONSUMER OF THE PRODUCT WAS AT LEAST
17 YEARS OLD; AND
(II) THE PRODUCT DANGER WAS KNOWN OR OPEN AND OBVIOUS
TO THE USER OR CONSUMER OF THE PRODUCT, OR SHOULD HAVE BEEN KNOWN OR
OPEN AND OBVIOUS TO THE USER OR CONSUMER OF THE PRODUCT.
(D) IN AN ACTION AGAINST A DEVELOPER ALLEGING HARM CAUSED BY A
DANGEROUS OR DEFECTIVE PRODUCT DUE TO THE FAILURE OF THE PRODUCT TO
CONFORM TO AN EXPRESS WARRANTY, THE PLAINTIFF SHALL PROVE BY A
PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE THAT THE HARM WAS PROXIMATELY CAUSED
BY THE FAILURE OF THE DEVELOPER TO EXERCISE REASONABLE CARE AND THAT:
(1) THE PLAINTIFF REASONABLY RELIED ON AN EXPRESS WARRANTY
MADE BY A DEVELOPER ABOUT A MATERIAL FACT CONCERNING THE SAFETY OF THE
PRODUCT; AND
(2) (I) 1. THE PRODUCT FAILED TO CONFORM TO THE EXPRESS
WARRANTY; AND
2. THE FAILURE OF THE PRODUCT TO CONFORM TO THE
EXPRESS WARRANTY RESULTED IN THE HARM; OR
(II) 1. THE EXPRESS WARRANTY WAS UNTRUE; AND
2. HAD THE EXPRESS WARRANTY BEEN TRUE, THE HARM
WOULD NOT HAVE OCCURRED.
(E) (1) A DEPLOYER MAY BE HELD LIABLE IN PLACE OF A DEVELOPER IN
AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION IF THE DEPLOYER:
(I) MADE A MATERIAL AND SUBSTANTIAL CHANGE TO THE
PRODUCT; OR

HOUSE BILL 712 7
(II) INTENTIONALLY MISUSED THE PRODUCT CONTRARY TO AN
EXPRESS WARRANTY AND THAT MISUSE WAS THE PROXIMATE CAUSE OF HARM
SUFFERED BY A PLAINTIFF.
(2) (I) USE OF A PRODUCT THAT IS INTENDED BY THE DEVELOPER
OF THE PRODUCT DOES NOT CONSTITUTE A MISUSE OR MATERIAL OR SUBSTANTIAL
CHANGE OF THE PRODUCT UNDER THIS SECTION.
(II) IF A DEVELOPER DOES NOT SPECIFY AN INTENDED USE FOR
THE PRODUCT, INTENDED USE MAY BE INFERRED BY THE TARGETED MARKET AND
MANNER OF DISTRIBUTION OF THE PRODUCT.
(3) A DEPLOYER LICENSING A PRODUCT MAY NOT BE HELD LIABLE TO
A PLAINTIFF FOR A VIOLATION UNDER THIS SECTION SOLELY BY REASON OF
OWNERSHIP OR USE OF A PRODUCT.
(F) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION, THERE IS A REBUTTABLE
PRESUMPTION THAT A PRODUCT IS NOT DANGEROUS OR DEFECTIVE IF:
(1) IN AN ACTION AGAINST A DEVELOPER, THE DEVELOPER:
(I) CONDUCTED A DOCUMENTED TESTING, EVALUATION,
VERIFICATION, VALIDATION, AND AUDITING OF THE PRODUCT CONSISTENT WITH
INDUSTRY BEST PRACTICES;
(II) MITIGATED FORESEEABLE RISKS TO THE EXTENT
POSSIBLE;
(III) DISCLOSED FORESEEABLE RISKS AND MITIGATION TACTICS
DIRECTLY TO DEPLOYERS AND CONSUMERS; AND
(IV) IF THE PRODUCT IS DESIGNED FOR OR REASONABLY LIKELY
TO BE USED BY MINORS, CONSIDERED AND MITIGATED FORESEEABLE RISKS TO
MINORS USING THE PRODUCT, INCLUDING:
1. THE IMPACT OF THE PRODUCT ON COGNITIVE AND
EMOTIONAL DEVELOPMENT;
2. THE IMPLEMENTATION OF AGE AND CONTENT
RESTRICTIONS; AND
3. PROVIDING CLEAR, ACCESSIBLE DISCLOSURES TO

HOUSE BILL 712
DEPLOYERS, CONSUMERS, AND GUARDIANS ABOUT POTENTIAL RISKS; OR
(2) IN AN ACTION AGAINST A DEPLOYER, THE DEPLOYER
IMPLEMENTED AND ADHERED TO A RISK MANAGEMENT POLICY THAT:
(I) SPECIFIES THE POLICY BY WHICH THE DEPLOYER WILL
IDENTIFY, DOCUMENT, AND MITIGATE ANY RISK, ESPECIALLY TO MINOR USERS,
THAT IS REASONABLY FORESEEABLE;
(II) IS CONSISTENT WITH INDUSTRY BEST PRACTICES;
(III) IS REASONABLE IN LIGHT OF:
1. THE SIZE AND COMPLEXITY OF THE DEPLOYER;
2. THE NATURE AND SCOPE OF THE PRODUCT,
INCLUDING THE INTENDED USES AND UNINTENDED USES, AS WELL AS ANY
MODIFICATION MADE TO THE SYSTEM BY THE DEPLOYER; AND
3. THE DATA THAT THE SYSTEM, ONCE DEPLOYED,
PROCESSES AS INPUTS; AND
(IV) IS ELECTRONICALLY AVAILABLE TO ITS EMPLOYEES AND TO
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL ON REQUEST.
3–2704.
(A) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION AGAINST A
DEVELOPER OR A DEPLOYER FOR HARM CAUSED BY A DANGEROUS OR DEFECTIVE
PRODUCT DESCRIBED IN § 3–2703 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) (1) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SECTION, THE ATTORNEY
GENERAL MAY OBTAIN:
(I) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF;
(II) A CIVIL PENALTY;
(III) DAMAGES, RESTITUTION, OR OTHER COMPENSATION ON
BEHALF OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS BEEN HARMED BY AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER RELIEF THAT THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

HOUSE BILL 712 9
CONSIDERS APPROPRIATE.
(2) IF THE USE OF THE SOFTWARE CAUSES PERSONAL INJURY OR
DEATH, A CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT EXCEED THE
APPLICABLE LIMITATION ON NONECONOMIC DAMAGES UNDER § 3–2A–09 OF THIS
TITLE.
(C) IN AN ACTION BROUGHT BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER THIS
SECTION, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS ENTITLED TO RECOVER THE COSTS OF THE
ACTION FOR THE USE OF THE STATE.
(D) BEFORE BRINGING AN ACTION UNDER THIS SECTION SEEKING
INJUNCTIVE RELIEF, THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL PROVIDE WRITTEN NOTICE
TO A DEVELOPER OR DEPLOYER AT LEAST 30 DAYS BEFORE COMMENCEMENT OF
THE ACTION THAT INCLUDES A DETAILED DESCRIPTION OF THE BASIS OF THE CLAIM
AND, WHEN POSSIBLE, THE OPPORTUNITY TO CURE ANY CONDITION GIVING RISE TO
THE CLAIM.
3–2705.
(A) (1) CONTRIBUTORY NEGLIGENCE IS NOT A DEFENSE TO AN ACTION
BROUGHT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE AND RECOVERY BY A PLAINTIFF MAY NOT BE
BARRED REGARDLESS OF THE PLAINTIFF’S DEGREE OF FAULT.
(2) RECOVERY BY A PLAINTIFF UNDER THIS SUBTITLE SHALL BE
REDUCED IN PROPORTION TO THE PERCENTAGE OF FAULT ATTRIBUTABLE TO THE
PLAINTIFF.
(B) A DEVELOPER AND A DEPLOYER MAY BE HELD JOINTLY AND SEVERALLY
LIABLE FOR THE PORTION OF HARM TO THE PLAINTIFF ATTRIBUTED TO THE
DEVELOPER AND DEPLOYER.
(C) IT IS NOT A DEFENSE TO AN ACTION BROUGHT UNDER THIS SUBTITLE
THAT AN ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM AUTONOMOUSLY CAUSED THE HARM
TO THE PLAINTIFF.
3–2706.
THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) SUPPLEMENTS ANY COMMON LAW TORT LIABILITY CAUSE OF
ACTION AND ANY STATE PRODUCT LIABILITY LAWS; AND

HOUSE BILL 712
(2) MAY NOT BE INTERPRETED TO PROHIBIT ANY PRODUCT
LIABILITY CAUSE OF ACTION INVOLVING A PRODUCT BROUGHT UNDER A DIFFERENT
CLAIM UNDER PRODUCT LIABILITY COMMON LAW OR STATUTE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.